test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-voolda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vȱlda: # Verb 10 'eng /est olla/fin' - full paradigm
     vȱlda+V+Inf: vȱlda
     vȱlda+V+Ger: vȯldsõ
     vȱlda+V+Sup: [vȯʼlmõ, vȯlmõ]
     vȱlda+V+Sup+Ine: [vȯʼlmõõs, vȯlmõõs]
     vȱlda+V+Sup+Ela: [vȯʼlmõõst, vȯlmõõst]
     vȱlda+V+Sup+Tra: [vȯʼlmõõks, vȯlmõõks]
     vȱlda+V+Sup+Abe: [vȯʼlmõõt, vȯlmõõt]
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: um
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ūotõ
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: umõd
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vȯʼļ, vȯļ]
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vȯʼļtõ, vȯļtõ]
     vȱlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vȯʼļtõ, vȯļtõ]
     vȱlda+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ūo
     vȱlda+V+Cond+Sg3: vȯlks
     vȱlda+V+Imprt+Sg2: [vȯʼl, vȯl]
     vȱlda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [vȯʼl, vȯl]
     vȱlda+V+Imprt+Pl2: vȯlgid
     vȱlda+V+Jus+Sg3: vȯlkõ
     vȱlda+V+QuoSg3: vȯļļi
     vȱlda+V+ActPrfPrc: vȯnd
     vȱlda+V+PssPrfPrc: vȯldõd
